California, session 20252026, AB2760.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25303.7 of the Government Code is amended to read:25303.7. (a) (1) A county may create a sheriff oversight board, either by action of the board of supervisors or through a vote of county residents, comprised of civilians to assist the board of supervisors with its duties required pursuant to Section 25303 that relate to the sheriff.(2) The members of the sheriff oversight board shall be appointed by the board of supervisors. The board of supervisors shall designate one member to serve as the chairperson of the board.(3) The members of the oversight board shall have access to the personnel records of peace officers and custodial officers required for the performance of the commission’s oversight duties. The oversight board shall maintain the confidentiality of these records consistent with Section 832.7 of the Penal Code.(b) (1) The chair of the sheriff oversight board shall issue a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum in accordance with Sections 1985 to 1985.4, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure whenever the board deems it necessary or important to examine the following:(A) Any person as a witness upon any subject matter within the jurisdiction of the board.(B) Any officer of the county in relation to the discharge of their official duties on behalf of the sheriff’s department.(C) Any books, papers, or documents in the possession of or under the control of a person or officer relating to the affairs of the sheriff’s department.(2) A subpoena shall be served in accordance with Sections 1987 and 1988 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(3) (A) If a witness fails to attend, or in the case of a subpoena duces tecum, if an item is not produced as set forth therein, the chair or the chair authorized deputy issuing the subpoena upon proof of service thereof may certify the facts to the superior court in the county of the board.(B) The court shall thereupon issue an order directing the person to appear before the court and show cause why they should not be ordered to comply with the subpoena. The order and a copy of the certified statement shall be served on the person and the court shall have jurisdiction of the matter.(C) The same proceedings shall be had, the same penalties imposed, and the person charged may purge themself of the contempt in the same way as in a case of a person who has committed a contempt in the trial of a civil action before a superior court.(4) A sheriff oversight board may conduct closed sessions, consistent with Section 54957, to review confidential records obtained under this section or otherwise related to its oversight duties, if those sessions comply with applicable confidentiality laws, including, but not limited to, Section 832.7 of the Penal Code.(c) (1) A county, through action of the board of supervisors or vote by county residents, may establish an office of the inspector general, appointed by the board of supervisors, to assist the board of supervisors with its duties required pursuant to Section 25303 that relate to the any of the following:(A) The sheriff.(B) The county animal control department, as defined in Section 31606 of the Food and Agricultural Code.(C) The office of chief probation appointed in accordance with Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 27770) of Part 3.(2) The inspector general shall have the independent authority to issue a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum subject to the procedure provided in subdivision (b).(3) The inspector general shall have access to the personnel records of peace officers and custodial officers required for the performance of the inspector general’s oversight duties. The inspector general shall maintain the confidentiality of these records consistent with Section 832.7 of the Penal Code.(d) The exercise of powers under this section or other investigative functions performed by a board of supervisors, sheriff oversight board, or inspector general vested with oversight responsibility for the sheriff shall not be considered to obstruct the investigative functions of the sheriff.SECTION 1.Section 33801 of the Education Code is amended to read:33801.(a)The Office of Civil Rights is hereby established under the administration of the Government Operations Agency.(b)The Director of the Office of Civil Rights shall be appointed by the Governor and subject to confirmation by the Senate.(c)The purpose of the office is to work directly with local educational agencies to prevent and address discrimination and bias pursuant to Section 220.(d)The office shall engage with and seek advice from coordinators established pursuant to this chapter on actions implemented by the office.